Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-208
Amendments; official and sample ballots; printing.

The ballots shall be printed, both official and sample, in conformity with the provisions of the Election Act regulating ballots at a general election.

Laws 1895, c. 5, § 2, p. 70;

R.S.1913, § 3705;

C.S.1922, § 3093;

C.S.1929, § 49-208;

R.S.1943, § 49-208;

Laws 1953, c. 171, § 1, p. 546;

Laws 1972, LB 661, § 77;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 560.

Election Act, see section 32-101.